Maine, session 132, LD732.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §30 is enacted to read:
§30. Copyright for works of State prohibited
Works of the State may not be afforded copyright protection, including under 17 United
States Code or any subsequent federal law. This section does not apply to merchandise sold
by a department or agency and does not preclude the State from receiving and holding a
copyright transferred to the State by assignment, bequest or otherwise or a copyright of a
work of the State existing prior to the effective date of this section.
Sec. 2. 27 MRSA §85-A, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 465, §2, is amended
to read:
9. Research and publications. To carry on research to increase knowledge in the
several fields of museum activity and to provide interpretive and information services,
including the dissemination and recording of information gathered through research.
Protection through copyright law may be obtained;